Washington statutes.
RCW 18.30.135

Discipline.

The Uniform Disciplinary Act, chapter 18.130 RCW, shall govern the issuance and denial of licenses, unauthorized practice, and the discipline of persons licensed under this chapter. The board shall be the disciplinary authority under this chapter.

[ 2013 c 171 s 6; 1995 c 336 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 336 ss 2 and 3: See note following RCW 18.130.040.